src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural illaive ihin bavk
!!€ miljardhiin: miljardi+Num+Pl+Ill
+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hin   #    ;
+Pl+Ill:%>i%>hi    NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral plural illaive iin back
!!€ kakshiin: kaksi+Num+Pl+Ill
+Pl+Ill:%>i%>in    #     ;
+Pl+Ill:%>i%>i     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIIN
+Pl+Ill:%>hi%>in    #     ;
+Pl+Ill:e^HMET2%>hi%>in    #     ;
+Pl+Ill:%>hi%>i     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;
+Pl+Ill:e^HMET2%>hi%>i     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIIN
+Pl+Ill:%>hi%>in    #     ;
+Pl+Ill:%>hi%>i     NUM_FRONT_POSS     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_HOIN
+Pl+Ill:%>ho%>in    #     ;
+Pl+Ill:%>ho%>i     NUM_BACK_POSS     ;

! possessives
LEXICON NUM_BACK_POSS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral possessive back
!!€ kahteni: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom+PxSg1 !Kainun kielessä possessiivisuffiksiita käytethään aika vähän. Annamme niiden olla täällä toistaiseksi.
+PxSg1:%>ni  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsa NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsa NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_POSS
!!€gt-norm: Numeral possessive front
!!€ yhteni: yksi+Num+Sg+Nom+PxSg1
+PxSg1:%>ni  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsä NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsä NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_POSS_AN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral possessive back aan
!!€ kolmeensa: kolme+Num+Sg+Par+PxSg3
+PxSg3:%>an    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>an    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_POSS_EN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral possessive back eenback
!!€ kaheksensa: kaksi+Num+Sg+Tra+PxSg3
!!€ kahekseen: kaksi+Num+Sg+Tra+PxSg3
+PxSg3:%>en    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral possessive back een front
!!€ neljeksensä: nelje+Num+Sg+Tra+PxSg3
!!€ neljekseen: nelje+Num+Sg+Tra+PxSg3
+PxSg3:%>en    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN
!!€gt-norm: Numeral possessive back ään
!!€ viittänsä: viisi+Num+Sg+Par+PxSg3
!!€ viittään: viisi+Num+Sg+Par+PxSg3
+PxSg3:%>än    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>än    NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_CLIT
!!€gt-norm: Numeral clitic back
!!€ kaksihan: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom+Foc/han
!!€ kakshan: kaksi+Num+Sg+Nom+Foc/han
+Foc/han:%>han   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>han%>khaan  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>han%>ko #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>han%>pa #        ;
+Qst:%>ko #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>ko%>han #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>ko%>khaan    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>ko%>ki    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>ko%>pa   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>ko%>s    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pa #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pa%>han #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pa%>khaan    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pa%>ki    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pa%>ko   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pa%>s    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>ki  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>ki%>han  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>ki%>khaan #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>ki%>ko    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>ki%>pa    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>khaan  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>khaan%>han  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>khaan%>ki #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>khaan%>ko    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>khaan%>pa    #        ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_CLIT
!!€gt-norm: Numeral clitic front
!!€ yksihän: yksi+Num+Sg+Nom+Foc/han
!!€ ykshän: yksi+Num+Sg+Nom+Foc/han
+Foc/han:%>hän   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>hän%>khään  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>hän%>kö #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>hän%>pä #        ;
+Qst:%>kö #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>kö%>hän #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>kö%>khään    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>kö%>ki    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>kö%>pä   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>kö%>s    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pä #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pä%>hän #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pä%>khään    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pä%>ki    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pä%>kö   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pä%>s    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>ki  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>ki%>hän  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>ki%>khään #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>ki%>kö    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>ki%>pä    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>khään  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>khään%>hän  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>khään%>ki #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>khään%>kö    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>khään%>pä    #        ;


! shorthands

LEXICON NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   NUM_BACK_CLIT    ;
0   NUM_COMPOUND ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT
0    #   ;
0   NUM_FRONT_CLIT    ;
0   NUM_COMPOUND ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_SINGULARS
0    NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
0    NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS
0    NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
0    NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_PLURALS
!0   NUM_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0   NUM_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_PLURALS
0   NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;


LEXICON NUM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT
0    NUM_BACK_POSS   ;
0    NUM_BACK_POSS_AN ;
0    NUM_BACK_CLIT ;
0   NUM_COMPOUND ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT
0    NUM_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN  ;
0    NUM_FRONT_CLIT ;
0   NUM_COMPOUND ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT
0    NUM_BACK_POSS   ;
0    NUM_BACK_POSS_EN ;
0    NUM_BACK_CLIT ;
0   NUM_COMPOUND ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT
0    NUM_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN  ;
0    NUM_FRONT_CLIT ;
0   NUM_COMPOUND ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_POSS_OPT
0    NUM_BACK_POSS   ;
0    NUM_BACK_CLIT ;
0   NUM_COMPOUND ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_POSS_OPT
0    NUM_FRONT_POSS   ;
0    NUM_FRONT_CLIT ;
0   NUM_COMPOUND ;
0    #    ;

LEXICON NUM_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL
0   NUM_BACK_POSS  ;
0   NUM_BACK_POSS_EN   ;

LEXICON NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL
0   NUM_FRONT_POSS  ;
0   NUM_FRONT_POSS_EN   ;

LEXICON NUM_COMPOUND
+Use/Circ#:0#   Numeral   ; ! xxx fix
+Use/Circ#:0#   NUM_ORD_SUFFIX  ;
+Use/Circ#:0#   NUM_CARD_SUFFIX ;






!  Collection numbers
! ---------------


!LEXICON COLLTAG
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPh       # ;
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Acc:%>idie            # ;
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPi       # ;
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Ill:%>idie            # ;
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Ine:%>inie            # ;
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          # ;
!          +N+Coll+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie # ;
! +N+Coll+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie # ;
!             +N+Coll+Ess:%>inie            # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff_w_dot
          +Sg+Nom: MARKDOT ;
          +Sg+Gen: MARKDOT ;
          +Sg+Acc: MARKDOT ;


LEXICON dateyearcase_fullsuff
          +Sg+Gen:%:n  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen:n  #      ;
          +Sg+Ine:%:ssa  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ine:ssa   #      ;
          +Sg+Ela:%:sta  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ela:sta   #      ;
          +Sg+Ill:%:iin  #      ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:iin    #      ;
      +Cmp/SplitR:%-   ENDLEX ;
      +Cmp/SplitR:%–   ENDLEX ;




!LEXICON ARABICCASES   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  to distinguish between 0 and oblique
!  ARABICCASE0 ;
!  ARABICCASE  ;

LEXICON ARABICCASES   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
+Arab: DIGITCASES ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASE ;

LEXICON ARABICCASE0   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  adds +Arab
 +Arab:  DIGITCASE0 ;

LEXICON DIGITCASES
 DIGITCASES ;
 DIGITCASE0 ;


LEXICON DIGITCASE0
       +Sg+Nom: # ;
  +Cmp/SplitR:%:%- ENDLEX ;


LEXICON DIGITCASE
         +Sg+Gen:n       # ;
         +Sg+Ill:iin      # ;
         +Sg+Ine:ssa     # ; ! NRK:sne
         +Sg+Ela:sta     # ; ! NRK:ste
         +Sg+All:lla     # ; ! NRK:sne
         +Sg+Abl:lta     # ; ! NRK:ste
            +Ess:ina     # ; ! NBR:ine
         +Pl+Nom:t       # ;
         +Pl+Gen:ien       # ;
         +Pl+Ill:ihin     # ;
         +Pl+Ine:issa    # ;
         +Pl+Ela:ista    # ;
         +Pl+All:illa    # ;
         +Pl+Abl:ilta    # ;
         +Pl+Com:ine     # ;
!ordinals

LEXICON ARABICCASEORD
       +Sg+Nom:%>s       # ;
       +Sg+Gen:%>nnen      # ;
       +Sg+Ill:%>nteen    # ;
       +Sg+Ine:%>nnessa   # ;
       +Sg+Ela:%>nnesta   # ;
       +Sg+Ess:%>ntena    # ;
       +Pl+Nom:%>nnet       # ;
       +Pl+Gen:%>nsien       # ;
       +Pl+Ill:%>nsiin    # ;
       +Pl+Ine:%>nsissa    # ;
       +Pl+Ela:%>nsista  # ;
       +Pl+Com:%>nnine # ;

!LEXICON ARABICCASECOLL
!  +Pl+Nom:%>t       # ;
! +Arab+Pl+Acc:%>sidie    # ;
! +Arab+Pl+Gen:%>si       # ;
! +Arab+Pl+Ill:%>sidie    # ;
! +Arab+Pl+Ine:%>sinie    # ;
! +Arab+Pl+Ela:%>sijstie  # ;
! +Arab+Pl+Com:%>sigujmie # ;
!    +Arab+Ess:%>sinie    # ;

LEXICON ARABICCASEORD-ERR
ARABICCASEORD ; ! XXX look at this
      





LEXICON yeartagpl
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Nom:        # ;
          +Num+Sem/Year+Pl+Gen:        # ;
! +Num+Sem/Year+Err/Orth+Pl+Ine:%:dinie # ;

LEXICON dateyearcase
      +Sg+Nom:        #      ;
      +Sg+Gen:n       #      ;
      +Sg+Ill:iin      #      ;
      +Sg+Ine:ssa     #      ; ! NRK:sne
      +Sg+Ela:sta     #      ; ! NRK:ste
         +Ess:ine     #      ; ! NBR:ine
      +Pl+Nom:t       #      ;
      +Pl+Gen:ien       #      ;
      +Pl+Ill:isiin     #      ;
      +Pl+Ine:issa     #      ;
      +Pl+Ela:ista    #      ;
      +Pl+Com:ine #      ;
  +Cmp/SplitR:%-      ENDLEX ;
  +Cmp/SplitR:%–      ENDLEX ;


LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL !
      +Rom+Sg+Gen:n   # ; ! But here 123a 123
      +Rom+Sg+Ill:iin  # ;
      +Rom+Sg+Ine:ssa # ;
      +Rom+Sg+Ela:sta # ;
      +Rom+Sg+Com:ine # ;
      +Rom+Sg+Ess:ina # ;
